Massachusetts, session 194th, S2280.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. The Massachusetts Housing Finance Agency shall transfer all assets, 
personnel, documents, and ongoing initiatives of the Massachusetts Community Climate Bank to 
the Massachusetts Clean Energy Technology Center.  
SECTION 2. Section 2 of chapter 23J of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding 
the following to subsection (a): 
“The center shall serve as the commonwealth’s Green Bank to accelerate clean energy 
adoption, climate resilience, and environmental sustainability by financing, supporting, and 
investing in residential, municipal, small business and larger commercial projects and such 
others as the center may determine. The center shall prioritize projects that advance the 

of 2 10 Commonwealth’s climate goals, reduce greenhouse gas emissions, and promote equitable access 
to clean energy. Such support shall include, but is not limited to, providing grants, loans, loan 
guarantees or debt and equity investments to projects that lower greenhouse gases within the 
commonwealth and working with local lenders to offer low or zero interest loans to new and 
existing clean energy and climate technology companies or ventures including but not limited to 
companies or ventures that offer building decarbonization, residential solar, nonprofit solar, 
electric car loans and vehicle financing.”